Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 9.2. Disclosure Requirements for Political Campaign Advertisements.

§§ 24.2-941 through 24.2-944.

Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to disclosure requirements for political campaign advertisements, see Chapter 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.) of Title 24.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892 repealed former Chapter 9.2 (§

24.2-941

et seq.) and recodified it as Chapter 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.) of Title 24.2.